Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1770
Loan officer license; opt out.

The chief executive officer or the credit committee may apply to the department on forms supplied by the department for the licensing of one or more loan officers in order to delegate to such loan officers the power to approve loans and disburse loan funds up to the limits and according to policies established by the credit committee, if any, and in the absence of a credit committee, the board of directors. Such application shall include information deemed necessary by the department and shall be signed by the entire credit committee, if any, and in the absence of a credit committee, the entire board of directors, as well as the new loan officer seeking a license. No person shall act in the capacity of loan officer for more than thirty days until approved by the department unless the credit union has elected to opt out of licensing loan officers on forms supplied by the department.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 70;

Laws 1999, LB 107, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 148.